hu: Színhatások: Balayage; Foilayage; Melír; Sötét melír; Többtónusú; Ombre; Piano blend; Lenőtt hatású; Egyszínű; Kéttónusú; Egyéb
it: Effetti di colore: Balayage; Foilayage; Colpi di sole; Riflessi scuri; Multitono; Ombré; Effetto piano; Effetto ricrescita; Tinta unita; Bicolore; Altro
el: Χρωματικά εφέ: Μπαλαγιάζ; Foilayage; Ανταύγειες; Lowlights; Πολλαπλών τόνων; Όμπρε; Piano blend; Σκούρα ρίζα; Ενιαίο; Δίχρωμο; Άλλο
de: Farbeffekt: Balayage; Foilayage; Highlights; Lowlights; Mehrfarbig; Ombré; Piano Blend; Ansatz; Einfarbig; Zweifarbig; Sonstige
pt-PT: Efeito de cor: Balayage; Foilayage; Madeixas; Madeixas escuras; Multitom; Ombré; Piano blend; Com raiz; Sólido; Bicolor; Outro
da: Farveeffekt: Balayage; Foilayage; Highlights; Lowlights; Multitone; Ombré; Piano blend; Mørk bund; Ensfarvet; Tofarvet; Andet
pt-BR: Efeito da cor: Balaiagem; Foilayage; Mechas; Lowlight; Multitons; Ombré; Piano blend; Raiz esfumada; Sólido; Bicolor; Outro
pl: Efekt kolorystyczny: Balejaż; Foilayage; Pasemka; Ciemne pasemka; Wielotonowy; Ombre; Piano blend; Z odrostem; Jednolity; Dwutonowy; Inny
lt-LT: Spalvų efektas: Balayage; Foilayage; Sruogavimas; Tamsintos sruogos; Kelių atspalvių; Ombre; „Piano blend“; Tamsintos šaknys; Vienspalvis; Dviejų atspalvių; Kita
vi: Hiệu ứng màu sắc: Balayage; Foilayage; Highlight; Lowlight; Nhiều tông màu; Ombre; Piano blend; Chân tóc sẫm màu; Đồng màu; Hai tông màu; Khác
tr: Renk efekti: Balyaj; Folyaj; Röfle; Gölge; Çok tonlu; Ombre; Piyano karışımı; Koyu dipli; Düz; Çift tonlu; Diğer
sk-SK: Farebný efekt: Balayage; Foilayage; Melír; Tmavý melír; Viacfarebné; Ombré; Piano blend; Tmavé korienky; Jednofarebné; Dvojfarebné; Iné
ru: Цветовой эффект: Балаяж; Фойлаяж; Мелирование; Затемнение; Мультитональное; Омбре; Пиано-колорирование; С затемненными корнями; Однотонный; Двухцветный; Другое
zh-TW: 色彩效果: 巴黎畫染; 錫箔畫染; 挑染; 暗色挑染; 多色; 漸層染; 鋼琴染; 髮根染; 單色; 雙色; 其他
cs: Barevné efekty: Balayage; Foilayage; Melír; Tmavý melír; Vícebarevný; Ombré; Piano blend; S odrosty; Jednolitý; Dvoubarevný; Ostatní
ja: カラーエフェクト: バレイヤージュ; フォイラージュ; ハイライト; ローライト; マルチトーン; オンブレ; ピアノブレンド; ルーツカラー; ソリッド; ツートーン; その他
es: Efecto de color: Balayage; Foilayage; Mechas; Mechas oscuras; Multitono; Ombré; Mezcla piano; Efecto raíz; Sólido; Dos tonos; Otro
ro-RO: Efect de culoare: Balayage; Foilayage; Șuvițe; Șuvițe închise; Multiton; Ombre; Piano blend; Cu rădăcini vizibile; Uniform; În două tonuri; Altele
fi: Väritehoste: Balayage; Foilayage; Raidat; Tummat raidat; Monisävyinen; Ombre; Pianoraidat; Tumma tyvi; Yksivärinen; Kaksisävyinen; Muu
th: เอฟเฟกต์สี: บาลายาจ; ฟอยล์ลายาจ; ไฮไลต์; โลว์ไลต์; มัลติโทน; ออมเบร; เปียโนเบลนด์; สีเข้มที่โคน; สีเดียว; ทูโทน; อื่นๆ
nb: Fargeeffekt: Balayage; Foilayage; Lyse striper; Mørke striper; Flerfarget; Ombre; Piano blend; Rotfarget; Ensfarget; Tofarget; Annet
sv: Färgeffekt: Balayage; Foilayage; Slingor; Mörka slingor; Flerfärgad; Ombre; Piano blend; Rooted; Enfärgad; Tvåfärgad; Övrigt
hr-HR: Efekt boja: Balayage; Foilayage; Pramenovi; Tamni pramenovi; Višebojno; Ombre; Piano mješavina; S tamnim korijenom; Jednobojno; Dvobojno; Ostalo
nl: Kleureffect: Balayage; Foilayage; Highlights; Lowlights; Meerkleurig; Ombre; Piano blend; Rooted; Effen; Tweekleurig; Overige
bg-BG: Ефекти на цвят: Балаяж; Фоилаяж; Кичури; Тъмни кичури; Многотонално; Омбре; Пиано кичури; Тъмни корени; Плътен цвят; Двуцветно; Друго
sl-SI: Barvni učinek: Balayage; Foilayage; Prameni; Temni prameni; Več odtenkov; Ombre; Piano prameni; Narastek; Ena barva; Dvobarvno; Drugo
ko: 색상 효과: 발레아쥬; 호일리아쥬; 하이라이트; 로우라이트; 멀티톤; 옴브레; 피아노 블렌드; 루티드; 솔리드; 투톤; 기타
zh-CN: 发色效果: 巴黎画染 (Balayage); 锡箔画染; 挑染; 暗染; 多色调; 渐变色; 钢琴染; 深色发根染; 纯色; 双色调; 其他
en: Color effect: Balayage; Foilayage; Highlight; Lowlight; Multi-tone; Ombre; Piano blend; Rooted; Solid; Two-tone; Other
fr: Effets de couleur: Balayage; Foilayage; Mèches; Mèches foncées; Multicolore; Ombré; Mélange piano; Racines apparentes; Uni; Bicolore; Autre